tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.aff
SFX W   ir    éramos      ullir
SFX W   ir    ésemos      ullir
SFX W   ir    éramos      uñir
SFX W   ir    ésemos      uñir
SFX W   ar    uvieseis    andar
SFX W   ar    uvierais    andar
SFX W   r     rais        [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     seis        [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     rais        [^n]dar
SFX W   r     seis        [^n]dar
SFX W   r     rais        [^d]ar
SFX W   r     seis        [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upierais    aber
SFX W   aber  upieseis    aber
SFX W   er    ieseis      [^fh]acer
SFX W   er    ierais      [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icierais    [fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icieseis    [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ieseis      aler
SFX W   er    ierais      aler
SFX W   er    yeseis      caer
SFX W   er    yerais      caer
SFX W   er    ieseis      e[cd]er
SFX W   er    ierais      e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yeseis      [eo]er
SFX W   er    yerais      [eo]er
SFX W   er    ieseis      ender
SFX W   er    ierais      ender
SFX W   ener  uvieseis    ener
SFX W   ener  uvierais    ener
SFX W   er    ieseis      er[dnt]er
SFX W   er    ierais      er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isieseis    erer
SFX W   erer  isierais    erer
SFX W   er    ieseis      o[clv]er
SFX W   er    ierais      o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udieseis    oder
SFX W   oder  udierais    oder
SFX W   er    ieseis      olver
SFX W   er    ierais      olver
SFX W   oner  usieseis    oner
SFX W   oner  usierais    oner
SFX W   er    ieseis      or[cd]er
SFX W   er    ierais      or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jeseis      raer
SFX W   er    jerais      raer
SFX W   r     eseis       alir
SFX W   r     erais       alir
SFX W   ebir  ibieseis    ebir
SFX W   ebir  ibierais    ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijeseis     ecir
SFX W   ecir  ijerais     ecir
SFX W   edir  idieseis    edir
SFX W   edir  idierais    edir
SFX W   egir  igieseis    egir
SFX W   egir  igierais    egir
SFX W   emir  imieseis    emir
SFX W   emir  imierais    emir
SFX W   eír   ieseis      eír
SFX W   eír   ierais      eír
SFX W   eñir  iñeseis     eñir
SFX W   eñir  iñerais     eñir
SFX W   eguir iguieseis   eguir
SFX W   eguir iguierais   eguir
SFX W   enchir inchieseis  enchir
SFX W   enchir inchierais  enchir
SFX W   endir indieseis   endir
SFX W   endir indierais   endir
SFX W   enir  inieseis    enir
SFX W   enir  inierais    enir
SFX W   entir intieseis   entir
SFX W   entir intierais   entir
SFX W   estir istieseis   estir
SFX W   estir istierais   estir
SFX W   erir  irieseis    erir
SFX W   erir  irierais    erir
SFX W   r     eseis       ernir
SFX W   r     erais       ernir
SFX W   ertir irtieseis   ertir
SFX W   ertir irtierais   ertir
SFX W   ervir irvieseis   ervir
SFX W   ervir irvierais   ervir
SFX W   r     eseis       eunir
SFX W   r     erais       eunir
SFX W   etir  itieseis    etir
SFX W   etir  itierais    etir
SFX W   irir  irieseis    irir
SFX W   irir  irierais    irir
SFX W   r     eseis       ohibir
SFX W   r     erais       ohibir
SFX W   ír    yerais      oír
SFX W   ír    yeseis      oír
SFX W   orir  urieseis    orir
SFX W   orir  urierais    orir
SFX W   ormir urmieseis   ormir
SFX W   ormir urmierais   ormir
SFX W   cir   jerais      ducir
SFX W   cir   jeseis      ducir
SFX W   r     erais       [^d]ucir
SFX W   r     eseis       [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yerais      [^g]uir
SFX W   ir    yeseis      [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyeseis     güir
SFX W   üir   uyerais     güir
SFX W   ir    erais       ullir
SFX W   ir    eseis       ullir
SFX W   ir    erais       uñir
SFX W   ir    eseis       uñir
SFX W   ar    uviesen     andar
SFX W   ar    uvieran     andar
SFX W   r     sen         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     ran         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     sen         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     ran         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     sen         [^d]ar
SFX W   r     ran         [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upieran     aber
SFX W   aber  upiesen     aber
SFX W   er    iesen       [^fh]acer
SFX W   er    ieran       [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icieran     [fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciesen     [fh]acer
SFX W   er    iesen       aler
SFX W   er    ieran       aler
SFX W   er    yesen       caer
SFX W   er    yeran       caer
SFX W   er    iesen       e[cd]er
SFX W   er    ieran       e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yesen       [eo]er
SFX W   er    yeran       [eo]er
SFX W   er    iesen       ender
SFX W   er    ieran       ender
SFX W   ener  uvieran     ener
SFX W   ener  uviesen     ener
SFX W   er    iesen       er[dnt]er
SFX W   er    ieran       er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isieran     erer
SFX W   erer  isiesen     erer
SFX W   er    iesen       o[clv]er
SFX W   er    ieran       o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udiesen     oder
SFX W   oder  udieran     oder
SFX W   er    iesen       olver
SFX W   er    ieran       olver
SFX W   oner  usieran     oner
SFX W   oner  usiesen     oner
SFX W   er    iesen       or[cd]er
SFX W   er    ieran       or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jesen       raer
SFX W   er    jeran       raer
SFX W   r     esen        alir
SFX W   r     eran        alir
SFX W   ebir  ibiesen     ebir
SFX W   ebir  ibieran     ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijesen      ecir
SFX W   ecir  ijeran      ecir
SFX W   edir  idiesen     edir
SFX W   edir  idieran     edir
SFX W   egir  igiesen     egir
SFX W   egir  igieran     egir
SFX W   emir  imiesen     emir
SFX W   emir  imieran     emir
SFX W   eír   iesen       eír
SFX W   eír   ieran       eír
SFX W   eñir  iñesen      eñir
SFX W   eñir  iñeran      eñir
SFX W   eguir iguiesen    eguir
SFX W   eguir iguieran    eguir
SFX W   enchir inchiesen   enchir
SFX W   enchir inchieran   enchir
SFX W   enir  iniesen     enir
SFX W   enir  inieran     enir
SFX W   endir indiesen    endir
SFX W   endir indieran    endir
SFX W   entir intiesen    entir
SFX W   entir intieran    entir
SFX W   erir  iriesen     erir
SFX W   erir  irieran     erir
SFX W   r     esen        ernir
SFX W   r     eran        ernir
SFX W   ertir irtiesen    ertir
SFX W   ertir irtieran    ertir
SFX W   ervir irviesen    ervir
SFX W   ervir irvieran    ervir
SFX W   estir istiesen    estir
SFX W   estir istieran    estir
SFX W   r     esen        eunir
SFX W   r     eran        eunir
SFX W   etir  itiesen     etir
SFX W   etir  itieran     etir
SFX W   irir  iriesen     irir
SFX W   irir  irieran     irir
SFX W   r     esen        ohibir
SFX W   r     eran        ohibir
SFX W   ír    yeran       oír
SFX W   ír    yesen       oír
SFX W   orir  uriesen     orir
SFX W   orir  urieran     orir
SFX W   ormir urmiesen    ormir
SFX W   ormir urmieran    ormir
SFX W   cir   jeran       ducir
SFX W   cir   jesen       ducir
SFX W   r     eran        [^d]ucir
SFX W   r     esen        [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yeran       [^g]uir
SFX W   ir    yesen       [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyesen      güir
SFX W   üir   uyeran      güir
SFX W   ir    eran        ullir
SFX W   ir    esen        ullir
SFX W   ir    eran        uñir
SFX W   ir    esen        uñir
SFX W   ar    uviere      andar
SFX W   r     re          [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     re          [^n]dar
SFX W   r     re          [^d]ar
SFX W   er    iere        [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciere      [fh]acer
SFX W   aber  upiere      aber
SFX W   er    iere        aler
SFX W   er    yere        caer
SFX W   er    iere        e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yere        [eo]er
SFX W   er    iere        ender
SFX W   ener  uviere      ener
SFX W   er    iere        er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isiere      erer
SFX W   er    iere        o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udiere      oder
SFX W   er    iere        olver
SFX W   oner  usiere      oner
SFX W   er    iere        or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jere        raer
SFX W   r     ere         alir
SFX W   ebir  ibiere      ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijere       ecir
SFX W   edir  idiere      edir
SFX W   egir  igiere      egir
SFX W   emir  imiere      emir
SFX W   eír   iere        eír
SFX W   eñir  iñere       eñir
SFX W   eguir iguiere     eguir
SFX W   enchir inchiere    enchir
SFX W   endir indiere     endir
SFX W   enir  iniere      enir
SFX W   entir intiere     entir
SFX W   erir  iriere      erir
SFX W   r     ere         ernir
