tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.dic
abatir/IOQRTVWX
abotagar/IOPRSVWX
acabar/IOPQRSTVWX
acardenalar/PSVWX
acetrinar/PSVWX
acochinar/PQSTVWX
acornear/PQSTVWX
acuclillar/OPRSVWX
adinerar/OPQRSTVWX
adverbializar/PSVWX
agabachar/PSVWX
agotar/IOPQRSTVWX
ahilar/IOPRSWX
alagar/PSVWX
alenguar/IPSWX
aljofifar/PSVWX
alustrar/PSVWX
amargar/OPRSVWX
ameritar/OPQRSTVWX
amoscar/IOPQRSTVWX
anclar/PQSTVWX
anublar/PSVWX
apasturar/PSVWX
apiadar/OPQRSTVWX
apostemar/HPSVWX
arbolecer/WX
arquear/IOPQRSTVWX
arriscar/IPSVWX
asedar/PSVWX
asonantar/PSVWX
ataviar/PSWX
atolondrar/IOPQRSTVWX
atronar/IPSWX
avasallar/ILOPQRSTVWX
azarar/OPQRSTVWX
baladronear/PSVWX
baratear/PSVWX
bascular/LPSVWX
bellotear/PSVWX
blandir/VWX
borboritar/PSVWX
bromar/PSVWX
caber/WX
calabacear/PSVWX
campanillear/PSVWX
capotear/PSVWX
carraspear/PSVWX
cautivar/PSVWX
cercar/PQSTVWX
chapar/PSVWX
chiclear/PSVWX
chuperretear/PQSTVWX
citar/HOPQRSTVWX
cobardear/PSVWX
coligar/HIOPRSVWX
competir/HVWXY
concursar/LPSVWX
conjuntar/PQSTVWX
contactar/PQSTVWX
contrapechar/PSVWX
coordinar/HILNPQSTVWX
cortejar/PQSTVWX
crespar/PSVWX
cuantiar/PSWX
cuquear/PQSTVWX
declamar/HPQSTVWX
deliberar/HLNPSVWX
dentellar/PSVWX
desabarrancar/PQSTVWX
desadormecer/WX
desalbardar/PSVWX
desanidar/PSVWX
desarrancar/OPRSVWX
desatornillar/PSVWX
desbarrigar/PSVWX
descalificar/HPQSTVWX
descarozar/PSVWX
descervigar/IPSVWX
descomprimir/OQRTVWX
descortinar/PSVWX
desdevanar/PSVWX
desemboscar/OPRSVWX
desempotrar/PSVWX
desencintar/PQSTVWX
desengomar/PSVWX
desenseñar/PSVWX
desespañolizar/PSVWX
desformar/PSVWX
desguarnecer/WX
deshojar/PSVWX
desladrillar/PSVWX
desmagnetizar/PQSTVWX
desmerecer/IQTWX
desnutrir/HORVWX
despachurrar/IPSVWX
despatarrar/OPQRSTVWX
despezar/PSVWX
despoetizar/PSVWX
desquijarar/OPQRSTVWX
destejar/PQSTVWX
destrizar/PSVWX
desvarar/PQSTVWX
detraer/OQWY
difumar/PSVWX
disciplinar/LOPQRSTVWX
disipar/HOPQRSTVWX
diñar/PQSTVWX
dudar/PQSTVWX
elegantizar/PSVWX
embarazar/PSVWX
emberrenchinar/OPRSVWX
embotar/IOPRSVWX
embrosquilar/PSVWX
empalomar/PSVWX
empañicar/PSVWX
empilar/PSVWX
empringar/PSVWX
enamoriscar/OPRSVWX
encajetillar/PSVWX
encanar/OPRSVWX
encapuzar/OPQRSTVWX
encatalejar/PSVWX
encerrizar/PSVWX
enclavijar/PSVWX
encorozar/PSVWX
encurdar/OPQRSTVWX
enfaldar/PSVWX
enfurecer/IOQRTWX
engarmar/OPRSVWX
engranar/PSVWX
engullir/QWY
enjorguinar/OPRSVWX
enlizar/PSVWX
enmasillar/PSVWX
enramblar/PSVWX
ensabanar/PSVWX
ensobear/PSVWX
entarascar/PSVWX
entrapajar/PSVWX
entreparecer/ORWX
entubajar/PSVWX
envenenar/IOPQRSTVWX
epitimar/PSVWX
escabechar/PSVWX
escamujar/PSVWX
escarificar/HPSVWX
escofinar/PSVWX
escudar/OPQRSTVWX
esguazar/PSVWX
esparvar/PSVWX
espitar/PSVWX
estatuir/QWY
europeizar/HPSWX
expandir/OQRTUVWX
extirpar/HOPQRSTUVWX
faldear/OPQRSTUVWX
fatigar/HOPQRSTUVWX
finiquitar/PSVWX
floretear/PSVWX
fracasar/PSVWX
frutar/PSVWX
ganguear/PSVWX
gemir/WY
golosinar/PSVWX
granjear/OPQRSTVWX
guasear/OPRSVW
hacinar/HIOPQRSTVWX
heder/WX
herrar/PQSTWX
hisopear/PSVWX
hormiguear/IPSVWX
humedecer/QTWX
iludir/VWX
importunar/HNPQSTVWX
incluir/OQWYZ
indisponer/OQRTWY
infringir/QTVWX
insalivar/HPQSTVWX
insumir/QTVWX
introducir/OQRTUWX
jarrar/PQSTVWX
ladronear/PSVWX
lañar/PSVWX
litofotografiar/PSWX
macizar/PSVWX
mampostear/PSVWX
marañar/PSVWX
maullar/PSVWX
merecer/INOQRTUWX
misar/PSVWX
montazgar/PSVWX
mullir/QWY
negreguear/PSVWX
obtemperar/PSVWX
orillar/PQSTVWX
pampear/PSVWX
pastelear/PSVWX
percibir/QTVWX
pescar/LPQSTVWX
pirrar/OPRSVWX
poder/OQSWYZ
potrear/PSVWX
preservar/HOPQRSTVWX
pronosticar/HPQSTVWX
puntualizar/HPQSTVWX
radiodifundir/QTVWX
rayar/PQSTVWX
rebramar/PSVWX
rechistar/PSVWX
recrecer/IWX
reestructurar/HPQSTVWX
regular/HMPQSTVWX
religar/HPSVWX
renacer/ILWX
repreguntar/PQSTVWX
resistir/OQRTVWX
retener/INOQRTUWX
reventar/OPQRSTWX
rodar/ILPQSTWX
runrunear/PSVWX
saltar/HOPQRSTUVWX
sensibilizar/HOPQRSTVWX
sirgar/PSVWX
sobreponer/OQRTWY
solidificar/HOPQRSTVWX
soñar/HPQSTWX
suplicar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
tapiscar/PSVWX
tembliquear/PSVWX
tipificar/HPQSTVWX
traer/OQWYZ
trapear/PSVWX
trastabillar/LPSVWX
trocear/PQSTVWX
umbralar/PSVWX
vapular/HIPSVWX
victimizar/HPQSTVWX
vulcanizar/HPQSTVWX
zoquetear/PSVWX
